Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 2434 (3) 91 ms/js/mb S.F. 2434 DIVISION I 1 PROHIBITION ON ACTION WITHOUT APPROVAL BY ORDINANCE 2 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2026, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 30. a. A county department, office, 5 or other subunit shall not adopt, implement, or enforce an 6 internal policy or rule unless the following conditions are 7 met: 8 (1) The policy or rule has been submitted to the board of 9 supervisors for approval. 10 (2) The policy or rule has been approved by ordinance 11 adopted by the board of supervisors. 12 b. Any ordinance approved by a county under this subsection 13 shall be accompanied by a cost analysis that presents the cost 14 to taxpayers and businesses and any other economic impacts of 15 the ordinance and shall be made accessible to the public on the 16 official internet site of the county. 17 c. This subsection shall not apply to any public safety 18 agency, as defined in section 34.1, subsection 4, or to offices 19 under the direction of county officers referenced in section 20 39.17. 21 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 22 following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 24. a. A city department, office, or other 24 subunit shall not adopt, implement, or enforce an internal 25 policy or rule unless the following conditions are met: 26 (1) The policy or rule has been submitted to the council 27 for approval. 28 (2) The policy or rule has been approved by ordinance 29 adopted by the council. 30 b. Any ordinance approved by a city under this subsection 31 shall be accompanied by a cost analysis that presents the cost 32 to taxpayers and businesses and any other economic impacts 33 of the ordinance and shall be made accessible to the public 34 on the official internet site of the city. If the city does 35 -1- SF 2434 (3) 91 ms/js/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2434 not have an official internet site, the information shall be 1 published on the internet site of the county in which the city 2 is located. If the city is located in more than one county, 3 the information shall be published on the internet site of the 4 county in which the largest population of the city resides. 5 c. This subsection shall not apply to any public safety 6 agency, as defined in section 34.1, subsection 4. 7 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to all policies, 8 rules, and ordinances adopted or implemented on or after the 9 effective date of this division of this Act. 10 -2- SF 2434 (3) 91 ms/js/mb 2/ 2